Udmurt.dic
адӟиськытъяны/c
адресаны/c
азвесьвуаны/c
азьпалъяны/c
акайыны/b
акыляны/c
альсыралляны/c
аналъяны/c
анйыны/b
аньыяны/c
араны-турнаны/c
арйыны/b
бабылляны/c
бадӟыматъялляны/c
бакелляны/c
басыланы/c
беглояны/c
бекыраны/c
бергалляны/c
берпумъяны/c
бечолояны/c
биньгозыяны/c
бирдыяны/c
бичаны/c
борданы/c
бордосаны/c
борӟаны/c
борыялляны/c
бӧмъялляны/c
бӧтьыраны/c
бугораны/c
бугрояны/c
будыны-пушйыны/b
буёлалляны/c
буйгатъяны/c
булавкияны/c
бунӟытъяны/c
бурдъяны/c
буревайыны/b
бурйыны/b
бурсйыны/b
бусӥраны/c
бушаны/c
буяны/c
быгылляны/c
быдэнъяны/c
бызьылытъяны/c
бырдалляны/c
бырйыны/b
бытарланы/c
бычыялляны/c
вагаяны/c
вазгатъяны/c
вайыны/b
вайялляны/c
вакчияны/c
валатъяны/c
вальканы/c
ваменъяны/c
ваньмытъяны/c
васьканы/c
ватсалляны/c
вачеяны/c
веднаны/c
векчиялляны/c
венчаны/c
вераны/c
веръялляны/c
веськатъяны/c
вешалляны/c
визалляны/c
визыланы/c
визьмаськытъяны/c
визьтэммытъяны/c
викышъяны/c
висъетаны/c
виялляны/c
вогйыны/b
вогъяны/c
вожаны/c
вожвайыны/b
вожманы/c
возъяны/c
возьытаны/c
вольытаны/c
воляны/c
ворекъялляны/c
воротаяны/c
воръяны/c
вотсаны/c
вӧжйыны/b
вӧлдэтаны/c
вӧсялляны/c
вӧялляны/c
вугыяны/c
вузалляны/c
вунэтъяны/c
вушйыны/b
выжалляны/c
выжъяны/c
выжыятъяны/c
выйыны/b
вылынъяны/c
вынъяны/c
вытаны/c
галяны/c
герданы/c
гогыялляны/c
гожмалляны/c
гожъяны/c
гойыны/b
гольканы/c
гомӟытъяны/c
гордмалляны/c
гочалляны/c
гӧрланы/c
губиялляны/c
гудыръялляны/c
гужатъяны/c
гужемйыны/b
гужйыны/b
гумылляны/c
гурӟытъяны/c
гуртаны/c
гыалляны/c
гыбыраны/c
гылӟытъяны/c
гыльдыръяны/c
гыркйыны/b
гыркъяны/c
дагаяны/c
дасяны/c
дӥсялляны-кутчалляны/c
дӥсятъяны-кутчатъяны/c
долканы/c
долэкъяны/c
дранчаяны/c
дуланы/c
дунояны/c
дурвайыны/b
дуринъяны/c
дыатъяны/c
дыльдыяны/c
дэймытъяны/c
дэриялляны/c
егитаны/c
ежманы/c
езъяны/c
етӥнаны/c
ёзъяны/c
ёркалляны/c
ёрмытъяны/c
ёршаны/c
жальманы/c
жильтыръяны/c
жингыръяны/c
жӧланы/c
ӝегалляны/c
ӝиканы/c
ӝожаны/c
ӝоманы/c
ӝуаны/c
ӝубйыны/b
ӝужйыны/b
ӝуткалляны/c
ӝутыны-дэмланы/c
ӝытазеяны/c
заглавияны/c
запасалляны/c
зарнивуаны/c
заряданы/c
зӥбытаны/c
золатъяны/c
зубекъяны/c
зуманы/c
зурканы/c
зуродалляны/c
зыгалляны/c
зынъяны/c
зырыманы/c
ӟераны/c
ӟечбураны/c
ӟечыраны/c
ӟигомытъяны/c
ӟимыраны/c
ӟонгыралляны/c
ӟуганы/c
ӟузгалляны/c
ӟыгыръяны/c
избураны/c
интыяны/c
исьнераны/c
йӧкураны/c
йӧнъяны/c
йылосъялляны/c
йылъяны/c
йылыны-пушйыны/b
йырйыны/b
кабъяны/c
кайыны/b
калшалляны/c
канжатъяны/c
каптырнаяны/c
каргалляны/c
кастарланы/c
кебаны/c
келляны/c
кенжытъяны/c
кепыр-вайыны/b
кетыганы/c
кечыръяны/c
кильыраны/c
киськалляны/c
клейстераны/c
кожыръяны/c
кокытъяны/c
колысалляны/c
коньыгубияны/c
копышъяны/c
корсэталляны/c
косканы/c
котыресъяны/c
кӧкыялляны/c
кӧтаны/c
кӧт-уланы/c
кӧяллян-вӧялляны/c
куажгатъяны/c
куайыны/b
куасалъяны/c
кугӟаны/c
кужмояны/c
кузйыны/b
кузьманы/c
кукекъяны/c
культояны/c
куноялляны/c
кураны/c
куриканы/c
куръялляны/c
кутсалляны/c
куӵаны/c
куялляны/c
кыеданы/c
кызйыны/b
кылбуралляны/c
кыминъяны/c
кырӟаны-вераны/c
кыршаны/c
кысканы/c
кытыкъялляны/c
кышланы/c
лазеганы/c
лайыны/b
ланьыръяны/c
лачкытъяны/c
лельтаны/c
липетаны/c
лобатъяны/c
лӧбыртъяны/c
лӧсъяны/c
лулъялляны/c
лусйыны/b
лыдъялляны/c
лысвуаны/c
лэзяны/c
лэчканы/c
люканы/c
лябомытъяны/c
майыганы/c
мамыкалляны/c
мекалляны/c
моганы/c
муганы/c
муромытъяны/c
мушканы/c
мызяны/c
мырдъяны/c
мыркйыны/b
напыляны/c
наяны/c
нёреданы/c
ниматъяны/c
нискыланы/c
нуназеялляны/c
нуыны-вайыны/b
нуятъяны/c
ныпъялляны/c
нысъяны/c
ньылышъяны/c
нюраны/c
нянялляны/c
ободаны/c
ожалъяны/c
ораны/c
ӧбыляны/c
ӧртаны/c
пазниканы/c
палдытъяны/c
палэсъяны/c
паньыраны/c
паськытаны/c
пачыланы/c
пеймытъяны/c
перераны/c
пирсэкъяны/c
питсаны/c
пломбаяны/c
погылляны/c
пожатъяны/c
портманы/c
пӧзьыраны/c
пӧрмытъяны/c
пӧсьвуаны/c
пружинаяны/c
пужйыны/b
пузаны/c
пумиталляны/c
пуньыланы/c
пурляны/c
пусйыны/b
пушйыны/b
пушманы/c
пыдсалляны/c
пызйыны/b
пызьыраны/c
пыргытъяны/c
пырсйыны/b
пытсаны/c
рамкаяны/c
сайкалляны/c
сайяны/c
сантэмалляны/c
сарпаны/c
серекъялляны/c
серыялляны/c
сигъяны/c
синйыны/b
синяны/c
сӥляны/c
смолаяны/c
стругалляны/c
сузьйыны/b
суйыны/b
суланы/c
супыраны/c
сыланы/c
сьӧдманы/c
сэраны/c
сюйыны/b
сюмалляны/c
сялалляны/c
тайыны/b
такыланы/c
тарканы/c
тӥгыляны/c
тӥйыны/b
тодматъяны/c
толйыны/b
тӧганы/c
тӧлӟытъяны/c
тубтаны/c
туйыны/b
туктаны/c
тулысаны/c
тулысйыны/b
тупаны/c
турнаны/c
тыланы/c
тышкалляны/c
тэлегъяны/c
тэтэяны/c
тяпканы/c
удысаны/c
узатъяны/c
узыяны-борыяны/c
уйыны/b
укнояны/c
укшатъяны/c
улпуаны/c
умйыны/b
умояны/c
урдсэтаны/c
уртсаны/c
усыкмытъяны/c
усьяны-пытсаны/c
учыралляны/c
чагыраны/c
чатыралляны/c
чеберъяны/c
ческытаны/c
чидалляны/c
чизйыны/b
чильтэръяны/c
чонгыраны/c
чотаны/c
чулалляны/c
чуртнаны/c
чутыръялляны/c
чызйыны/b
чырсатъяны/c
ӵашйыны/b
ӵогаськытъяны/c
ӵогйыны/b
ӵошалляны/c
ӵужаны/c
ӵыкмытъяны/c
шайялляны/c
шапыраны/c
шебеляны/c
шералляны/c
шинъяны/c
шоканы/c
шонермытъяны/c
шӧдытъяны/c
шӧталляны/c
шугекъяны-вогекъяны/c
шуланы/c
шупаны/c
шыдвуаны/c
шырчианы/c
ызьыяны/c
ымйыны/b
ынъяны/c
ысъяны-косъяны/c
эктыны-кырӟаны/c
энсыраны/c
эркияны/c
юалляны-вералляны/c
югдытъяны/c
юзаны/c
юмшаны/c
юрмульыяны/c
юшаны/c
янгараны/c
ятвылъяны/c
